test/src/morphology/N-torii_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - torī: # Noun 71 'eng /est toru/fin' - full paradigm
     torī+N+Sg+Nom: torī
     torī+N+Sg+Gen: torī
     torī+N+Sg+Par: torī
     torī+N+Sg+Dat: torīn
     torī+N+Sg+Ins: torīks
     torī+N+Sg+Ill: [torī, torīz]
     torī+N+Sg+Ela: torīst
     torī+N+Pl+Nom: torīd
     torī+N+Pl+Gen: torīd
     torī+N+Pl+Par: torīdi
     torī+N+Pl+Dat: torīdõn
     torī+N+Pl+Ins: torīdõks
     torī+N+Pl+Ill: torīž
     torī+N+Pl+Ela: torīsti
